Oklahoma, session 2025, SB969.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 69 O.S. 2021, Section 1707, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1707. A. The Oklahoma Turnpike Authority is hereby


authorized and empowered to acquire, by purchase, or condemnation,


land or such interest therein as in its discretion may be necessary


for the purpose of establishing, constructing, maintaining, and


operating turnpike projects or relocation thereof, and facilities


necessary and incident thereto, or necessary in the restoration of


public or private property damaged or destroyed, including borrow


areas, detours, channel changes, concession areas, public or private

Req. No. 359 Page 1


access roads, and deposits of rock, gravel, sand, and other road


building material for use in turnpike construction and maintenance,


upon such terms and at such price as may be considered by it to be


reasonable and can be agreed upon between the Authority and the


owner thereof, and to take title thereto in the name of the


Authority,; provided, that such right and title shall be limited to


the surface rights only and shall not include oil or other mineral


rights.


B. Groundwater rights may be severed from surface rights, upon


the written request of the owner of land to be acquired; however, an


owner of groundwater rights shall not have a right of access to the


Authority’s acquired surface rights. No person may construct,


maintain, or operate any water well, drilling equipment, or lines on


or under the surface acquired by the Authority without express


written approval of the Authority.


C. A property owner with property abutting a turnpike project


shall be compensated for damage to the property caused by the


turnpike project, whether directly or indirectly. Compensation


shall be made in the form of correction of the damage, monetary


compensation for the devaluation of the property, or, at the request


of the property owner, acquisition of the property for the fair


market value of the property prior to the damage plus all costs of


relocation incurred by the property owner.



Req. No. 359 Page 2


D. 1. The Authority shall be required to acquire, at the


request of a property owner whose property abuts a turnpike project,


the real property abutting any right-of-way property acquired for a


turnpike project, up to and including one thousand (1,000) feet from


the boundary of the right-of-way acquired for the project.


2. At the time the Authority commences the process of any


right-of-way acquisition for all or a portion of a turnpike project,


whether by way of voluntary purchase or condemnation, the Authority


shall provide written notice, via certified and first-class mail, of


the intended right-of-way acquisition to all owners of real property


abutting the right-of-way to be acquired for the project. The


written notice shall include a statement that the property owners


may request compensation for or acquisition of their real property


abutting the right-of-way acquired for the turnpike project, up to


and including one thousand (1,000) feet from the boundary of the


right-of-way acquired for the project. The notice shall include a


mailing address to which owners may submit a written request for


compensation for or acquisition of abutting property.


3. Any property owner requesting compensation for abutting


property shall make such request to the Authority in writing, via


certified and first-class mail, no later than twenty (20) days after


the receipt of the notice. Upon receipt of a valid request for


compensation for abutting real property, the Authority shall proceed


to make a good-faith offer of compensation, and further, shall

Req. No. 359 Page 3


negotiate in good faith with the abutting property owner to reach an


agreement for compensation. If the parties fail to agree upon the


amount of such compensation within one hundred eighty (180) days of


the date on which the property owner made such request, the


Authority shall, within ninety (90) days, commence an action in the


district court where the real property is located for a


determination and award to the property owner of such compensation.


Either party to the action shall be entitled to a trial by jury. If


the award of compensation in any such action exceeds the Authority’s


last best offer to the property owner by ten percent (10%) or more,


the property owner shall be entitled to reasonable attorney fees,


appraisal fees, and expert witness fees incurred in the action.


4. Any property owner requesting acquisition of abutting


property shall make such request to the Authority in writing, via


certified and first-class mail, no later than twenty (20) days after


the date of receipt of the notice. Upon receipt of a valid request


for acquisition of abutting real property, the Authority shall


proceed with the acquisition in the same manner and on the same


legal terms and conditions as the acquisition of a right-of-way for


the turnpike project.


E. As used in this section, “damage” means a negative impact to


the access, air, light, view, enjoyment, or monetary value of a


property.



Req. No. 359 Page 4


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-359 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:46:55 AM





































Req. No. 359 Page 5